Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4072.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 135.010 is amended to read:
135.010. When the accusatory instrument has been filed, and if the defendant has been arrested,
or as soon thereafter as the defendant may be arrested, the defendant shall be arraigned thereon
as provided in ORS 135.030 before the court in which it is found. Except for good cause shown or
at the request of the defendant, if the defendant is in custody, the arraignment shall be held during
the first 36 hours of custody, excluding holidays, Saturdays and Sundays. In all other cases, except
as provided for in ORS 133.060, the arraignment shall be held within 96 hours after the arrest, ex-
cluding holidays, Saturdays, Sundays and any other time period within the normal business
hours of the court during which the court is closed.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 135.010 by section 1 of this 2026 Act apply to
arraignments on accusatory instruments filed on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-INTRO) Page 1

Passed by House February 17, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-INTRO) Page 2